District of Columbia statutes.
47-2831

Vehicles hauling goods from public space.

Owners of vehicles for hire, used in hauling goods, wares, or merchandise, and operating from public space, shall pay a license tax of $25 per annum for each vehicle. Stands for such vehicles upon public space may be established in the manner provided in § 50-2201.03. Licenses issued under this section shall date from April 1st of each year, but may be issued on or after March 15th of such year; provided, however, that all licenses issued for a period prior to April 1, 1940, shall expire on March 31, 1940, and the license fee therefor shall be prorated accordingly.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 626, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 33
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 557, ch. 366
Apr. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 570, ch. 41
July 17, 1939, 53 Stat. 1046, ch. 313, § 3
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.
Motor fuel tax, public hackers not affected, see § 47-2313.
This section is referenced in § 47-2829.
1981 Ed., § 47-2831.
1973 Ed., § 47-2333.